Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.145

Unlawful advertising of indemnity benefits.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee subject to the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW to advertise to the effect that benefits in the form of indemnity will accrue to subscribers of health care service contracts for services performed by the licensee for a subscriber when the licensee is neither a health care service contractor nor a participant. A violation of this section shall be punishable as provided in RCW 18.53.140(10).

[ 1969 c 143 s 2.]